Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-639
Motorcycle, defined.

Motorcycle shall mean every motor vehicle having a seat or saddle for the use of the rider and designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, excluding tractors and electric personal assistive mobility devices.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 135;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 452.